District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.31

Establishment of the RLA Revitalization Corporation; board of directors and management; powers

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30a
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-188, § 2(c), 49 DCR 6516
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Resolution 15-601, the “Disposition of Lot 831 in Square 560 Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective July 13, 2004.

Resolution 15-811, the “Disposition of Lot 89 in Square 542 Approval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective December 21, 2004.

Resolution 16-530, the “Disposition of Land Interest Held in 401 M Street, S.W., Lot 0089 Square 0542, Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective February 19, 2006.

Resolution 16-849, the “Development of Small Parcels Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective October 27, 2006.

Resolution 17-286, the “Disposition of Lot 27 and a Portion of Lot 832 in Square 560 Emergency Approval Resolution of 2007”, was approved effective July 10, 2007.

Resolution 17-297, the “RLARC Disposition of Lots 30 and 31 in Square 2664 Emergency Approval Resolution of 2007”, was approved effective July 10, 2007.